Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-601
Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs; created; members; terms; vacancy.

(1) The Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs is created. The commission shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The Director of Economic Development or his or her designee;

(b) The Adjutant General or his or her designee;

(c) The Director of Veterans' Affairs or his or her designee; and

(d) Three residents of the State of Nebraska, one from each congressional district. At least one of the three residents shall have current or prior military experience and at least one shall have a background in business.

(2) The commission shall have the following nonvoting, ex officio members:

(a) The veterans' program coordinator of the Department of Labor;

(b) The chairperson of the State Committee of Employer Support of the Guard and Reserve;

(c) The commander of the United States Air Force's 55th Wing or his or her designee;

(d) The commander of the United States Strategic Command or his or her designee;

(e) The commander of the United States Air Force's 557th Weather Wing or his or her designee;

(f) The commander of the United States Air Force's 95th Wing or his or her designee;

(g) The commander of the United States Air Force's 90th Missile Wing or his or her designee;

(h) The Director of the Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency or his or her designee;

(i) The Department of Defense service secretary or service component appointed representative for Nebraska;

(j) The commander of any future wing which may be positioned or established in Nebraska or his or her designee; and

(k) The commander of any military headquarters located in Nebraska not represented elsewhere in this section or his or her designee.

(3) The members of the commission described in subdivision (1)(d) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor. The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members described in subdivision (1)(d) of this section so that one member serves for a term of two years, one member serves for a term of three years, and one member serves for a term of four years. Succeeding appointments shall be for terms of four years and shall be made in the same manner as the original appointments. The terms of the members shall begin on October 1 of the year in which they are appointed unless appointed to fill a vacancy. Appointments to fill a vacancy, occurring other than by the expiration of a term of office, shall be made for the unexpired term of the member whose office is vacated.

Laws 2016, LB754, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB138, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB787, § 1.
July 18, 2026